Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 7. Statewide Branch Banking

Editor's notes. —

Both
Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1, and
Laws 1991, ch. 146, § 1, enacted an article 6 of chapter 2 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 135, § 1, have been redesignated as article 7 (§§

13-2-701

through

13-2-708

).

§ 13-2-701.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Branch” means any manned branch bank, branch office, branch agency, additional office, separate office or any branch or separate place of business operated by a parent bank in this state which offers any or all of the banking services conducted at a parent bank, but excludes a remote electronic terminal as defined in W.S. 13-1-501(a)(v) and loan production offices operated in accordance with W.S.

13-2-709

;

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 62, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

“Parent bank” means a state or national bank which operates or has applied to operate a branch in this state;

“This act” means W.S.

13-2-701

through

13-2-708

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

13-2-601

; Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3; 1995, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 42, § 2; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-2-702.
Authorization; application; fee; activities; examination; criteria.

With prior approval of the state banking commissioner a bank may establish and operate one (1) or more branches at any location in this state or in a state other than Wyoming.

All applications for establishing and operating a branch shall be filed with the commissioner and be accompanied by a filing fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner. The application shall be signed by the chief executive officer of the applicant bank and contain and be accompanied by the following information:

Name and address of the applicant bank;

Exact location of the proposed branch;

Certification of publication of notice of the application at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed branch will be located;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 41, § 2.

Certification that the applicant bank is well capitalized, as defined by rule of the commissioner;

Certification of compliance with the provisions of W.S.

13-3-201

relating to investment limitations in bank premises;

Certification that the establishment of the branch does not involve a prohibited insider transaction or management interlock;

Discussion of any planned variances in the applicant bank’s lending policy, procedures or services at the proposed branch;

Other information as the commissioner may require in order to determine if the requirements of this section are met.

The commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority for the branch to the applicant bank within twenty (20) days after receipt of the complete application and fee unless he finds:

Establishment or operation of the proposed branch would pose undue risk to the capital or surplus requirements of the applicant bank;

The name of the proposed branch does not reasonably identify the branch as a branch of the applicant bank or is likely to unduly confuse the public; or

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 62, § 2.

The applicant bank has failed to substantially comply with applicable law governing its operation.

The certificate of authority expires one (1) year after its issuance unless the branch has opened and business has begun in good faith.

The application fee provided by subsection (b) of this section shall be deposited by the state banking commissioner with the state treasurer and credited to the financial institutions administration account. Expenditures shall be made from the account by warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the director or commissioner. Funds from the account shall be expended only to carry out the duties of the commissioner or the state banking board. If the application expenses are less than the amount of the fee, the unexpended amount shall remain within the account.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Every branch bank in this state shall be licensed by the commissioner before operating, engaging in or conducting a banking business.

The commissioner shall fix the amount of the initial license fee and annual renewal fee by rule and regulation.

An application for an initial branch license shall be submitted to the commissioner in writing in the form and containing the information required by the commissioner. Each licensed branch of a bank chartered under the laws of this state or of any other state is subject to compliance examinations as the commissioner deems necessary.

The activities and operations of a branch are attributable to the applicant bank for purposes of determining qualification for authority to do business in this state.

An out-of-state bank which has established a Wyoming branch may establish and operate one (1) or more branches at any location in this state, subject to the requirements of subsections (g) through (k) of this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-602; Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 1995, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 1999, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; ch. 42, § 3; 2001, ch. 156, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (e), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” or a variant thereof at the end of both the first and final sentences.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or in a state other than Wyoming” to the end of the sentence in (a); and deleted “by means of an interstate merger pursuant to article 8 of chapter 2 of this title” in (m).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (g), inserted the present second sentence; and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “The license shall be renewed annually, not more than sixty (60) nor less than thirty (30) days before the anniversary date upon which the initial license is issued.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (b), substituted “rule and regulation of the commissioner”
for “rule by the commissioner, but not more than two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,000.00)” in the first sentence; in
(g), deleted the second and third sentences which read: “Each
branch bank license shall expire on June 30 of each year.
The license
shall be renewed annually, not less than thirty (30) days before
the
license's expiration date.”; in (h), deleted the second
sentence
which read “Annual renewal fees may be assessed on
a graduated
or progressive scale based on deposits, assets, business
volume, loans
or a combination of these or other factors as determined
by the commissioner.”;
and in (j) deleted “or renewal
of a branch license”
after “initial branch license”
in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 13-2-703.
Amendment to articles of incorporation.

Before opening a branch under this act, the applicant bank shall deliver an amendment to its articles of incorporation reflecting the branch to the commissioner in the same manner provided in W.S.

13-4-102

. W.S.

13-4-102

applies to all amendments to articles of incorporation delivered under this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-603; Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1999, ch. 41, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 13-2-701(a)(v).

§ 13-2-704.
Closing of a branch.

No branch shall be closed unless the parent bank certifies to the commissioner that all persons with an account at that branch have been notified of the date of closure not less than sixty (60) days before the date of closure and that a notice indicating the branch will be closed will be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the branch is located at least weekly for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the calendar week in which the date of closure will occur.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-604; Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

§ 13-2-705.
Bank facility not a branch.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a bank may establish and operate a facility which shall not be considered a branch, but an extension or expansion of an existing parent bank or branch if the facility is:

Within the boundary lines of a single contiguous area of property owned or leased and occupied as a place of business by a parent bank or branch bank, whether or not the facility is physically connected to the bank or place of business; or

Across a street, alley, railroad right-of-way or thoroughfare from the existing parent bank or branch bank when such facility is physically connected to the bank or place of business by a private, enclosed, secure overhead passageway, underground tunnel or pneumatic tube system; or

Within one thousand (1,000) yards of the parent bank or branch bank, whether or not such facility is physically connected to the bank or place of business, after being granted prior written approval of the department stating that the facility qualifies for this exemption.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-605.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 13-2-701(a)(v).

§ 13-2-706.
No limits on authority of existing branches and banks.

Nothing in this act shall limit the authority of any existing branch or bank operating at the time this act takes effect.

History.

W.S. 1977, § 13-2-606; Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-2-701(a)(v).

§ 13-2-707.
Prohibition on foreign bank branching.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as permitting a bank to establish a branch in any state other than Wyoming. Except as provided in W.S. 13-2-702(m) and

13-2-901

through

13-2-904

, a bank not authorized or organized to do business under the laws of this state, or a bank organized under the laws of a country other than the United States, shall not establish or operate a branch in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-607; 1997, ch. 75, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 13-2-701(a)(v).

§ 13-2-708.
Antitrust laws.

If, but for this act, any action by any one (1) or more banks would be in violation of the laws of this state or of the United States, commonly referred to as the antitrust laws, then this act shall be construed so as to permit or require only actions that shall not be in violation of the laws.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 13-2-608.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 13-2-701(a)(v).

§ 13-2-709.
Loan production offices; activities; notification; examination; name.

After notifying the commissioner, a bank may establish and operate one (1) or more loan production offices. A loan production office may conduct any of the following activities:

Solicit loans on behalf of the bank or a branch of the bank;

Assemble credit information;

Make property inspections and appraisals;

Secure title information;

Prepare applications for loans, including making recommendations with respect to action;

Solicit investors to purchase loans from the bank and to contract with the bank for servicing of such loans; and

Any other activity that federal authorities have approved for a loan production office operated by a national bank.

A bank shall not accept deposits, originate deposits or savings or checking accounts, approve loans or disburse loan funds at a loan production office established pursuant to this section.

The notification to the commissioner shall include the following information:

The street address of the loan production office;

A general description of the area where the loan production office will be located;

The proposed activities to be conducted at the loan production office and the types of loans to be solicited at the office.

Each loan production office shall be subject to examination and supervision by the commissioner in the same manner and to the same extent as the bank. If the commissioner determines that the loan production office is violating any applicable law or that the operation of the loan production office is adversely affecting the safety and soundness of the bank, the commissioner may take any appropriate administrative action authorized in this act.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a bank from establishing and operating a loan production office in a state other than Wyoming, provided that the bank complies with all applicable provisions of Wyoming law, the law of the state where the loan production office will be located and federal law.

Every loan production office operating in this state, including a loan production office operated by a federally chartered financial institution or an out-of-state bank, shall include the words “loan production office” in its title, official documents, letterhead, advertisements, signs and any other communications with its customers or the general public.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).